Hawaii statutes.
§88-83.5 Benefit limitations. (a)
Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the benefits payable to all
employees who first become members on or after January 1, 1990, shall be
subject to the limitations set forth in section 415 of the Internal Revenue
Code of 1986, as amended, applicable to governmental plans. The dollar limit
in section 415(b)(1)(A) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, shall
be adjusted automatically under section 415(d) of the Internal Revenue Code of
1986, as amended, effective January 1 of each year, as published in the
Internal Revenue Bulletin. The automatic adjustment shall apply to members,
former employees with vested benefit status, and retirants. To the extent the
applicable interest rate, as defined in section 417(e)(3) of the Internal
Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, is used in computing the limitations under
section 415 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, the stability
period for the purposes of applying section 1.417(e)-1(d)(4) of the United
States Treasury Regulations shall be one calendar year beginning January 1, and
the lookback month for the purposes of applying section 1.417(e)-1(d)(4) of the
United States Treasury Regulations shall be the fourth full calendar month
preceding the first day of the stability period (September).

(b) Effective January 1, 2009, the following
rules shall apply for the purposes of applying the limitations in section
415(b) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended:

(1) The dollar limit in section 415(b)(1)(A) of the
Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, shall be applied to the member's
annual benefit as of the member's annuity starting date, as defined in section
417(f)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, without regard to
any automatic cost-of-living increases; and

(2) In no event may the member's annual benefit
exceed the dollar limit applicable at the member's annuity starting date, as
defined in section 417(f)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended,
as increased in subsequent years pursuant to section 415(d) of the Internal
Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.

(c) Notwithstanding any other law to the
contrary, the benefits payable to all employees who first became members before
January 1, 1990, shall be subject to the greater of the following limitations
as provided in section 415(b)(10) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as
amended:

(1) The limitations set forth in section 415 of the
Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended; or

(2) The benefit of the member without regard to any
benefit increases pursuant to an amendment adopted after October 14, 1987.

(d) The system shall establish a benefit
restoration plan for the payment of retirement benefits as permitted under
section 415(m) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, as follows:

(1) All retirants and beneficiaries of the system
whose pension has been limited by section 415 of the Internal Revenue Code
shall receive a monthly benefit from the plan established pursuant to this
subsection that is equal to the difference between the retirement benefit
otherwise payable and the retirement benefit payable because of section 415 of
the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended;

(2) Participation in the plan shall be determined for
each plan year and shall cease whenever the retirement benefit is not limited
by section 415 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended;

(3) The plan shall be funded on a
plan-year-to-plan-year basis and shall not be used to pay any benefits payable
in future years. Upon the recommendation of the system's actuary, the required
contribution amount shall be determined by the board and deposited in a
separate fund from an allocation of employer contribution amounts pursuant to
this chapter;

(4) The board shall administer the plan and may make
modifications to the benefits payable as may be necessary to maintain the
qualified status of the plan under section 415(m) of the Internal Revenue Code
of 1986, as amended. [L 1990, c 104, §1; am L 2000, c 215, §2; am L 2008, c 41,
§5; am L 2013, c 124, §3]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next